Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,229
Inspection of information; publication of notice.

(1) Each emergency plan, material safety data sheet, list of chemicals, inventory form, toxic chemical release form, and followup emergency notice shall be made available to the general public, consistent with section 322 of Title III, during normal working hours at the location or locations designated by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment, the commission, or a local emergency planning committee, as appropriate. Upon request by an owner or operator of a facility subject to the requirements of section 81-15,224, the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment, the commission, or the appropriate committee shall withhold from disclosure under this section the location of any specific chemical required by section 81-15,225 to be contained in an inventory form as tier II information.

(2) Each local emergency planning committee shall annually publish a notice in local newspapers that the emergency plan, material safety data sheets, and inventory forms have been submitted under this section. The notice shall state that followup emergency notices may subsequently be issued. Such notice shall announce that members of the public who wish to review any such plan, sheet, form, or followup notice may do so at the location designated under subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 39;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 149;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 437.